elotl/utils/fst/lexc/fon-ilv.lexc
LEXICON Root
Cns ;
Vow ;

LEXICON Loop
Cns ;
Vow ;
Punct ;
 #  ;

LEXICON FrontVow
i:i Loop ;
í:í Loop ;
e:e Loop ;
é:é Loop ;
e%::e Loop "weight: 1.0";
i%::i Loop "weight: 1.0";

LEXICON HighBackVow
u:u CnsNonGlottal ;
uj:u CnsNonGlottal ;
ú:ú Cns ;

LEXICON LowBackVow
a:a Loop ;
ã:ã Loop ;
á:á Loop ;
o:o Loop ;
ó:ó Loop ;
a%::a Loop "weight: 1.0";
o%::o Loop "weight: 1.0";

LEXICON Vow
HighBackVow ;
FrontVow ;
LowBackVow ;

LEXICON CnsSigueVelar
j:h Loop ;
h:h Loop ;
h:h FrontVow ;
h:h LowBackVow ;

b:b Loop ;
kʷ:ku Vow ;
t͡ʃ:ch Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
k:qu FrontVow ;
k:c LowBackVow ;
k:c HighBackVow ;
k:c # ;
k:c CnsSigueVelar ;
m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
ñ:ñ Vow ;
p:p Loop ;
r:r Loop ;
t:t Loop ;
ts:tz Vow "weight: 2.0";
ƛ:tl Loop ;
v:v Loop ;
w:u Vow ;
ʃ:x Loop ;

s:c FrontVow ;
s:s LowBackVow ;
s:s HighBackVow ;
s:s Cns ;
s:s # ;

y:y Loop ;
l:l Loop ;

LEXICON CnsNonGlottal
ʔ:h Cns ;
ʔ:h # ;
j:h Loop ;
h:h Loop ;

b:b Loop ;
kʷ:cu Vow ;
kʷ:uc Cns ;
kʷ:uc # ;
t͡ʃ:ch Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
k:qu FrontVow ;
k:c LowBackVow ;
k:c HighBackVow ;
k:c # ;
k:c CnsSigueVelar ;
m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
ñ:ñ Vow ;
p:p Loop ;
r:r Loop ;
t:t Loop ;
ts:tz Vow "weight: 2.0";
ƛ:tl Loop ;
v:v Loop ;
w:u Vow ;
w:u Cns ;
w:u # ;
ʃ:x Loop ;
s:s FrontVow ;
s:s LowBackVow ;
s:s HighBackVow ;
s:s Cns ;
s:s # ;
y:y Loop ;
l:l Loop ;

LEXICON Cns
ʔ:h Cns ;
ʔ:h # ;
j:h Loop ;
h:h Loop ;
b:b Loop ;
kʷ:cu Vow ;
kʷ:uc Cns ;
kʷ:uc # ;
t͡ʃ:ch Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
k:qu FrontVow ;
k:c LowBackVow ;
k:c HighBackVow ;
k:c # ;
k:c Punct ;
k:c CnsSigueVelar ;
m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
ñ:ñ Vow ;
p:p Loop ;
r:r Loop ;
t:t Loop ;
ts:tz Vow "weight: 2.0";
ƛ:tl Loop ;
v:v Loop ;
w:u Vow ;
w:u Cns ;
w:u # ;
ʃ:x Loop ;
s:s FrontVow ;
s:s LowBackVow ;
s:s HighBackVow ;
s:s Cns ;
s:s # ;
s:s Punct ;
y:y Loop ;
l:l Loop ;

LEXICON Punct
%':%' Loop ;
%":%" Loop ;
%!:%! Loop ;
%¡:%¡ Loop ;
%#:%# Loop ;
%$:%$ Loop ;
%%:%% Loop ;
%&:%& Loop ;
%(:%( Loop ;
%):%) Loop ;
%*:%* Loop ;
%+:%+ Loop ;
%,:%, Loop ;
%-:%- Loop ;
%.:%. Loop ;
%\:%\ Loop ;
%::%: Loop ;
%;:%; Loop ;
%<:%< Loop ;
%>:%> Loop ;
%=:%= Loop ;
%>:%> Loop ;
%?:? Loop ;
%@:%@ Loop ;
%[:%[ Loop ;
%]:%] Loop ;
%/:%/ Loop ;
%^:%^ Loop ;
%`:%` Loop ;
%{:%{ Loop ;
%}:%} Loop ;
%|:%| Loop ;
%~:%~ Loop ;
%.:%. Loop ;
%¿:%¿ Loop ;
%”:%” Loop ;
%“:%“ Loop ;
%—:%— Loop ;
%‘:%‘ Loop ;
%’:%’ Loop ;
